Hawaii statutes.
[§378-74] Effect on employment and
collective bargaining agreements; benefits. Nothing in this part shall be
construed to supersede any provision of any employment agreement, collective
bargaining agreement, or employment benefits program or plan that provides
greater benefits or rights than those benefits or rights established under
section 378-72. [L 2003, c 60, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next